Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1987.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Limitation on School Mascots.--(a) A school entity may not have or adopt a name, symbol or image that depicts or refers to a Native American tribe, individual, custom or tradition for a mascot, nickname, logo or letterhead unless the school entity:(1) Has received the express written consent of a tax-exempt corporation in good standing founded prior to 1945 whose mission focuses exclusively on Native American rights.(2) C onducts a school-wide program on Native American 1234567891011121314151617181920 culture at least twice per school year.(3) O ffers a course of study to the school entity's students outlining Native American contributions to society.(4) F iles an annual report with the State Board of Education detailing what academic programs on Native American culture and history the school entity has offered during the school year.(b) A school entity that fails to comply with this section shall be ineligible to be a member of the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association or participate in Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association sponsored athletic contests.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School entity." Any of the following:(1) A school district. (2) An intermediate unit. (3) An area career and technical school. (4) A charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.(5) A private school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1987PN2506 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122